District of Columbia statutes.
10-1103.09

Vault abutting single- or two-family dwelling exempt from rental charge.

Nothing contained in this part shall be construed as authorizing the Council of the District of Columbia to impose a rental charge for the use of any vault abutting real property on which is located a single- or two-family dwelling occupied solely for residential purposes, but any such vault shall otherwise be subject to the provisions of this part.

History

Oct. 17, 1968, 82 Stat. 1162, Pub. L. 90-596, title III, § 310

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1015.
1973 Ed., § 7-916.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.